New Jersey, session 222, A2862.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: "Critical infrastructure" means property and equipment owned or used by communication networks, electric generation, transmission, and distribution systems, gas distribution systems, water pipelines, and related support facilities that serve multiple customers and residents, including, but not limited to, real and personal property such as buildings, offices, lines, poles, pipes, structures, and equipment. Foreign adversary means any foreign government determined by the United States Secretary of Commerce to have engaged in a long-term pattern or serious instances of conduct significantly adverse to the national security of the United States or the security and safety of United States persons. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the State of New Jersey, and all agencies or political subdivisions thereof, shall not allow the participation of a foreign company created under the laws of any foreign adversary in the construction, maintenance, or control of any critical infrastructure in this State. c.     This section shall not apply to agreements entered into prior to the enactment date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), except that any agreement that contradicts the provisions of this section shall not be renewed. 2.    This act shall take immediately.